New York, session 2025-2026, A8494.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 2 and section 3 of chapter 394 of 2 the laws of 2018 amending the insurance law relating to the implementa- 3 tion of a valuation manual and relating to directing the department of 4 financial services to study the impact of the implementation of such 5 valuation manual, are amended to read as follows: 6 3. The superintendent of the department of financial services shall 7 submit a report to the governor, temporary president of the senate and 8 speaker of the assembly of the department's findings in the second[,] 9 and fifth [and seventh] years after the operative date of the valuation 10 manual. 11 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately[; and shall be deemed 12 repealed 10 years after it shall have become a law]. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11913-01-5